West Virginia, session 2025, SB478.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. State Board of education. §18-2-25e. Athletic eligibility of transfer students. [Repealed.] NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the requirement that the West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission modify its rules to allow high school students to transfer schools and retain athletic eligibility, so that the Commission may modify its rules relating to athletic eligibility of transfer students in its discretion.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home